Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2

Tennessee Retail Food Safety Act

53-8-201. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Tennessee Retail Food Safety Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-202. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this part to ensure that foods offered for public consumption in Tennessee are safe as prepared, processed, served, packaged, and delivered. Food service establishments that are located within retail food stores are subject to this part and exempt from regulation in accordance with title 68, chapter 14, part 7.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Alteration” shall be defined by rule, but shall not mean function replacement that equals or makes better the existing operation of the facility;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture, the commissioner's duly authorized representative, and in the event of the commissioner's absence or vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner;

“Demonstration of knowledge” means the ability to demonstrate knowledge of food safety principles as applicable to establishments regulated in accordance with this part;

For the purposes of this part, “demonstration of knowledge” may be accomplished by one (1) or more of the following means:

Completing an inspection that reflects no priority item violation;

Employing at least one (1) person certified as a food protection manager who has shown proficiency of food protection information through passing a test that is part of a certification program that is evaluated and listed by an accrediting agency recognized by the Conference for Food Protection as conforming to the Conference for Food Protection Standards for Accreditation of Food Protection Manager Certification Programs; or

Responding correctly to food protection questions related to the specific food operation. A person responding to the questions may be aided by the utilization of food safety procedures posted prominently for employees who may use the procedures as reference guides. The commissioner shall assist establishments that request information relative to risks associated with the establishments' specific food operation, which may be posed as questions during the inspection;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Employee” means a person:

In charge of a food establishment;

Engaged in the preparation of food or drink;

Engaged in service of food to the establishment's clientele; or

Engaged in ware washing;

“Extensive remodeling” means the repair, construction, alteration or installation of new equipment, modification of existing equipment or fixtures, changes in floor plan layout, addition of new processes, expansion to new space, or significant changes to use of space or equipment;

“Farm to consumer distribution point” means a temporary or permanent location, that is not open to the general public, where a farmer or the farmer's agent delivers food, produced by the farmer and previously sold under an agreement entered into between the farmer and the consumer, directly to the consumer or the consumer's agent;

“Food Code” means the 2009 Food Code as published by the United States department of health and human services, public health service, food and drug administration;

“Food establishments” means retail food stores, and food service establishments located within retail food stores;

The term “food establishments” is to be used throughout this part when a provision is applicable to both retail food stores and food service establishments located within retail food stores;

“Food service establishment” means any establishment, place or location, whether permanent, temporary, seasonal, or itinerant, where food is prepared and the public is offered to be served or is served food, including, but not limited to, foods, vegetables, or beverages not in an original package or container, food and beverages dispensed at soda fountains and delicatessens, sliced watermelon, ice balls, or water mixtures;

“Food service establishment” includes places identified in subdivision (10)(A), regardless of whether there is a charge for the food;

“Food service establishment” does not include private homes where food is prepared or served and not offered for sale, retail food store operations other than delicatessens, the location of vending machines or supply vehicles;

“Food service establishment” does not include churches, temples, synagogues or other religious institutions, civic, fraternal, or veteran's organizations where food is prepared, served, transported, or stored by volunteer personnel only on non-consecutive days; provided, however, that the storage of unopened, commercially canned food, packaged bulk food that is not potentially hazardous as defined by department rules and regulations, and dry goods shall not apply for these purposes;

“Food service establishment” does not include grocery stores that may, incidentally, make infrequent casual sales of uncooked foods for consumption on the premises, or any establishment whose primary business is other than food service, that may, incidentally, make infrequent casual sales of coffee or prepackaged foods, or both, for consumption on the premises. For the purposes of this subdivision (10)(E), “infrequent casual sales” means sales not in excess of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per day on any particular day;

“Food service establishment” does not include a location from which casual, occasional food sales are conducted solely in connection with youth-related amateur athletic or recreational activities or primary or secondary school-related clubs by volunteer personnel and that are in operation for twenty-four (24) consecutive hours or less;

“Food service establishment” does not include a catering business that employs no regular, full-time employees, the food preparation for such business is solely performed within the confines of the principal residence of the proprietor, and the catering business makes only “occasional sales” during any thirty-day period; and

“Food service establishment” does not include a house or other residential structure where seriously ill or injured children and their families are provided temporary accommodations in proximity to their treatment hospitals and where food is prepared, served, transported or stored by volunteer personnel; provided, that the house or structure is supported by a § 501(c)(3) organization, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), that has as a component of its mission the support of programs that directly improve the health and well-being of children;

“Imminent health hazard” means any condition, deficiency, or practice that, if not corrected, is very likely to result in illness, injury, or loss of life to any person;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, corporation, agency, municipality, state or political subdivision, or the federal government and its agencies and departments;

“Person in charge” means an individual present at a food establishment who is responsible for the operation at the time of inspection. A “person in charge” shall be present at the establishment during food preparation and handling, and may put instructions in place for cleaning and preparing the establishment prior to the preparation of any food or beverage; and

“Retail food store” means any establishment or a section of an establishment where food and food products are offered to the consumer and intended for off-premise consumption;

“Retail food store” does not include:

Establishments that handle only prepackaged, non-potentially hazardous foods, as defined by department rules and regulations;

Roadside markets that offer only fresh fruits and fresh vegetables;

Food and beverage vending machines;

Food service establishments not located within a retail food store; or

A person who makes infrequent casual sales of honey or who packs or sells less than one hundred fifty gallons (150 gals.) of honey per year.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 3; 2017, ch. 272, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the intent of the General Assembly to encourage the expansion of agricultural sales by farmers, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 272.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added the definition of “farm to consumer distribution point.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

Acts 2017, ch. 272, § 5. May 4, 2017.

53-8-204. Authority of commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to:

Carry out or cause to be carried out all provisions of this part;

Collect all fees established pursuant to this part and apply the fees in accordance with the procedures of the department of finance and administration to the necessary and incidental costs of the administration of this part. Nothing in this subdivision (2) shall be construed to prohibit the department from receiving, by way of general appropriation, such sums as may be required to fund adequately the implementation of this part, as recommended in the annual budget by the governor to the general assembly;

Prescribe rules and regulations, including emergency rules, governing the alteration, construction, sanitation, safety of food, and operation of food establishments as may be necessary to protect the health and safety of the public, and require food establishments to comply with these rules and regulations. A non-elected body of any municipality, county, or metropolitan government shall not enact any ordinance or issue any rule or regulation pertaining to food safety or the provision of nutritional information related to food or drink, or otherwise regulate menus at food establishments. If, on July 1, 2015, the federal government takes action regarding the provision of food nutritional information at food establishments, and the federal action specifically authorizes state agencies to enforce such action, then the department of agriculture shall be the department that is primarily responsible for the implementation and supervision of any new requirements and shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as necessary to effectuate the purposes of such requirements. The commissioner shall not prescribe any such rules and regulations that are in conflict with the minimum statewide building construction standards established by the state fire marshal pursuant to § 68-120-101. The rules with respect to food temperature shall be specific with respect to the types of food prepared and the risks presented by those foods. Except as specifically provided herein, the commissioner may, by the promulgation of rules and regulations, adopt all or part of the Food Code;

Inspect or cause to be inspected as often as the commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion may deem necessary, every food establishment in the state as authorized by this part, to determine compliance with this part and with rules and regulations;

Issue or cause to be issued, suspend, and revoke permits to operate food establishments as provided in this part;

Notify the owner, proprietor, or agent of any food establishment of such changes or alterations as may be necessary, to effect complete compliance with this part and with rules and regulations governing the construction, alteration, and operation of the facilities, and close the facilities for failure to comply within specified times as provided in this part and in rules and regulations;

Enter into agreements or contracts with the Shelby, Davidson, and Knox county health departments for the health departments to implement this part in their areas of jurisdiction, if the commissioner deems it appropriate; provided, that the following conditions shall apply:

State reporting requirements shall be met by the county health department or departments;

The county health department program standards shall be identical to those of the state law, and to rules and regulations;

The commissioner shall retain the right to exercise oversight and evaluation of performance of the county health department or departments and terminate the agreement or contract for cause immediately, or otherwise upon reasonable notice;

The commissioner may set such other fiscal, administrative, or program requirements as the commissioner deems necessary to maintain consistency and integrity of the statewide program;

Staffing and resources shall be adequate to implement and enforce the program in the local jurisdiction;

Contract county health departments that collect the applicable permit fees from food establishments located within the county shall retain one hundred percent (100%) of the permit fees and penalty fees. Contract counties that utilize the services of the department for the collection of permit fees shall receive ninety-five percent (95%) of permit fees collected within a contract county pursuant to §§ 53-8-204 — 53-8-206. This amount shall be calculated based upon fees collected in the contract county during the state's fiscal year multiplied by ninety-five percent (95%);

Upon the application of a food establishment for a variance based on a showing of good cause and an affirmative demonstration that the risks to the public attendant to the limited activities have been mitigated, the commissioner shall grant the establishment a variance from the limitations in the Food Code regarding restrictions pertaining to bare hand contact. A request for a variance shall be granted or denied within sixty (60) days of the commissioner's receipt of the application for variance. A request for a variance shall include the following:

A listing of the specific ready-to-eat foods that are touched by bare hands;

Diagrams and other information showing that hand washing facilities are located and equipped as prescribed by the applicable provisions of the Food Code;

An employee health policy documenting that the food service establishment complies with:

The person in charge requirements; and

Requirements for monitoring the health of food service employees;

Proper fingernail maintenance;

Prohibition on jewelry; and

Good hygienic practices;

Documentation that food service employees have received training on the:

Risks of contacting ready-to-eat foods with bare hands;

Practice of proper hand washing;

Documentation that food employees contacting ready-to-eat foods with bare hands used two (2) or more of the following control measures:

Double hand washing;

Nail brushes;

A hand antiseptic after hand washing;

Incentive programs that assist or encourage food service employees not to work when they are ill; or

Other control measures approved by the commissioner.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the Food Code to the contrary, the commissioner shall not require any further documentation for the granting of a variance other than those contained in this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-205. Appropriation of moneys.

All moneys coming into the state treasury pursuant to this part from fees, fines, and penalties shall be appropriated to the department for the payment of necessary expenses incident to the administration of this part, as determined by the commissioner. Any unexpended balance of the fund in any fiscal year shall be retained by the department to be used to provide or expand training for food service operators and the department's food safety staff.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-206. Permits — Expiration — Transfer not allowed — Display.

No person shall operate a food establishment who does not hold a valid permit issued to the person by the commissioner on or before July 1 of each year, or as the commissioner may otherwise provide by rule and regulation.

Every person now engaged in the business of operating a food establishment, and every person who, on July 1, 2015, engages in such a business, shall procure a permit from the commissioner for each food establishment so operated or proposed to be operated.

Each permit for food establishments shall expire on June 30 following its issuance or as the commissioner may otherwise provide by rule and regulation.

No permit shall be transferred from one (1) location or person to another.

The permit shall be kept and displayed in a conspicuous manner, and visible to the public in the food establishment for which it is issued.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-207. Application for permits — Inspection — Renewals — Exception.

Any person planning to operate a food establishment shall first submit an application for a permit on forms provided by the commissioner. The application shall be completed and submitted to the commissioner with the proper permit fee.

Prior to the approval of the application for a permit, the commissioner shall inspect the proposed facility to determine if the person applying for the permit is in compliance with the requirements of this part and with applicable rules and regulations. The commissioner shall issue a permit to the applicant if the inspection reveals that the facility is in compliance with such requirements.

Applications for renewal of permits for existing food establishments will be issued to the operators prior to the expiration date of the permit. When completed applications and the proper permit fees are returned to the commissioner, the commissioner shall issue new permits to applicants.

A permit shall not be required for the operation of a farm to consumer distribution point.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 7; 2017, ch. 272, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the intent of the General Assembly to encourage the expansion of agricultural sales by farmers, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 272.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

Acts 2017, ch. 272, § 5. May 4, 2017.

53-8-208. Suspension of permits.

The commissioner has the authority to suspend any permit to operate a food establishment issued pursuant to this part if the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that the permittee is not in compliance with this part; provided, that the permittee shall be given the opportunity to correct violations as provided in § 53-8-215.

Suspension of permits, other than those for temporary food service establishments, shall be of the following two (2) types:

A Class 1 suspension, which provides an opportunity for a hearing prior to the effective date of the suspension; and

A Class 2 suspension, which provides an opportunity for a hearing after the effective date of the suspension and is effective immediately.

Notice of either type of suspension may be given by the inspector on the inspector's regular inspection form or by written notification from the commissioner. When a permit suspension is effective, all food establishment operations shall cease. Class 2 suspensions shall only be issued if an imminent health hazard exists.

A written request for a hearing on either type of suspension shall be filed by the permittee within ten (10) days of the receipt of notice. This ten-day period may run concurrently with the ten-day period set forth in § 53-8-215. If a hearing is requested, it shall be commenced within a reasonable time of the request. If no request for a hearing is made within ten (10) days of receipt of notice, the suspension becomes final and is not subject to review.

The commissioner may end the suspension at any time if the reasons for the suspension no longer exist.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-209. Revocation of permits.

The commissioner may, after providing opportunity for a hearing, revoke a permit for serious or repeated violations of the requirements of this part or for interference with the commissioner in the performance of the commissioner's duty.

Prior to revocation, the commissioner shall notify the permittee, in writing, of the specific reason or reasons for which the permit is being revoked at the end of ten (10) days following service of the notice, unless a written request for a hearing is filed with the commissioner within the ten-day period. If no request for a hearing is filed within the ten-day period, the revocation of the permit becomes final.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-210. Service of notice.

A notice provided for in this part is properly served when it is delivered to the permittee or person in charge, or when it is sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the permittee. A copy of the notice shall be filed in the records of the commissioner.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-211. Hearings — Appeals.

The hearings provided for in this part shall be conducted by the commissioner in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Appeals from any final decision after a hearing shall be pursued in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply in a county where the health department is operating a program pursuant to § 53-8-204(7) that meets the minimum requirements of due process; provided, that appeals from final decisions made under such programs may be made to the commissioner, for the limited purpose of determining whether a material error of law was made at the county level. The appeal to the commissioner shall not be de novo, but shall be limited to a review of the record of the hearing at the county level.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-212. Application for permit after revocation.

Whenever revocation of a permit becomes final, upon demonstration that the conditions which led to the revocation have been cured, the holder of the revoked permit may make written application for a new permit.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-213. Permit fees.

The permit fee to operate a food establishment shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 13; Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 38.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The permit fee to operate a food establishment shall be in accordance with the following schedule:“(1) Retail food stores that contain within the premises a food service establishment that prepares potentially hazardous food, as defined by department rules and regulations, shall pay a permit fee as follows:

No. of Seats Fee Amount 0-50 $210 51 or more seats $360

Click to view table.“(2) Retail food stores that contain within the premises a food service establishment that offers self-service foods and does not prepare potentially hazardous foods, as defined by department rules and regulations, shall pay a permit fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00); and“(3) In addition to the fees in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2), all retail food stores shall pay an annual permit fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).“(b) If the permit fee is delinquent for more than thirty (30) calendar days, a penalty fee of one half (½) the permit fee shall be assessed, in addition to the permit fee. If a check is returned for any reason, a penalty fee of one half (½) the permit fee shall be assessed, in addition to the permit fee. The permit fee, plus any penalty fee, must be paid before the permit is issued.“(c) When application is made for a permit to operate any food establishment after January 1 of any year, or such other date as the commissioner may establish by regulation, the fee charged for the permit shall be one half (½) the annual rate; provided, however, that where the establishment was subject to permit requirements prior to January 1 or such other date as the commissioner may establish by rule and regulation, of any year, no such fractional rate shall be allowed.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015 at 12:01 a.m.; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

53-8-214. Inspection reports.

Inspection results for food establishments shall be recorded on standard departmental forms that summarize the requirements of the law and rules and regulations.

A copy of the completed inspection report shall be furnished to the person in charge of the facility at the conclusion of the inspection.

The most current inspection report furnished to the operator or person in charge of the establishment shall be made available at the facility for public disclosure to any person who requests to review it.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-215. Correction of violations.

The completed inspection report shall specify a reasonable period of time for correction of violations found.

Corrections of violations shall be accomplished within the period specified in accordance with the following:

If an imminent health hazard exists, the facility shall immediately cease operations until authorized to reopen by the commissioner;

All violations of priority items shall be corrected as soon as possible and in any event within ten (10) days following inspection. Within fifteen (15) days after inspection, the permittee shall notify the commissioner stating that priority item violations have been corrected. A follow-up inspection may be made for confirmation;

All other items shall be corrected as soon as possible, but no later than the time of the next routine inspection.

The inspection report shall state that failure to comply with any time limits specified by the commissioner for correction may result in cessation of operations. An opportunity for a hearing on the ordered corrective action shall be provided, if a written request is filed with the commissioner within ten (10) days following cessation of operations. If a request for a hearing is received, a hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after receipt of the request.

Whenever a facility is required under this section to cease operations, it shall not resume operations until it has shown on reinspection that the conditions that led to the order to cease operations no longer exist. Opportunity for reinspection shall be offered within a reasonable time.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-216. Examination of food — Hold orders.

Food may be examined or sampled by the commissioner as deemed necessary for the enforcement of this part. The commissioner may place a hold order on any food that the commissioner believes is in violation of this part or rules and regulations, upon written notice to the operator specifying particular reasons for the hold order. The commissioner shall tag, label, or otherwise identify any food subject to a hold order. No food subject to a hold order shall be used, served, sold, or moved from the establishment. The hold order may state that the food be held while confirmation is obtained that the condition violates this part or rules and regulations. The hold order may also order the operator to destroy food that violates this part or rules and regulations. The commissioner shall permit storage of the food under the conditions specified in the hold order, unless storage is not possible without risk to the health of the public, in which case immediate destruction shall be ordered and accomplished. The hold order shall state that a request for a hearing may be filed within ten (10) days. If a request for a hearing is received, the hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after receipt of the request. On the basis of evidence produced at the hearing, the hold order may be rescinded, or the owner or person in charge may be directed by written order to denature or destroy such food or to bring it into compliance with this part.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-217. Review and approval of plans and specifications.

Whenever a food establishment is constructed or extensively remodeled, and whenever an existing structure is converted to use as a food establishment, plans and specifications shall be submitted to the commissioner for review and approval before construction, remodeling, or conversion begins. The plans and specifications shall indicate the proposed layout, arrangement, mechanical plans, construction materials and work areas, and the type and model of proposed fixed equipment and facilities. The commissioner shall approve the plans and specifications, if they meet the requirements of this part and rules and regulations. No food establishment shall be constructed, extensively remodeled or converted, except in accordance with plans and specifications approved by the commissioner. Any deviation from the submitted plans and specifications previously approved by the commissioner discovered during an inspection that would not compromise the safety of food products shall not delay the issuance of a permit to operate a food establishment.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-218. Employee health.

When the commissioner has reasonable cause to suspect possible disease transmission by an employee of the facility, the commissioner may secure information about any recent illness of the employee or make other investigations as may be indicated. The commissioner may require any of the following:

The immediate exclusion of the employee from employment in the food establishment;

The immediate closing of the facility until, in the commissioner's opinion, no further danger of disease outbreak exists;

Restricting the employee's service to some area of the facility where there would be little likelihood of transmitting disease; or

Adequate medical and laboratory examinations of the employee and of other employees.

A person in charge, having been provided by the employee with written documentation from a person who practices in a medical profession in accordance with title 63 that the employee has been diagnosed with a condition set forth in Chapter 2, § 2-201.11(B)(2) of the Food Code shall have an affirmative duty to notify the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. A person in charge shall not be required to obtain medical records from a prospective employee prior to hiring such individual as an employee.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

53-8-219. Violations.

Any person operating a food establishment who fails or refuses to comply with any provision of this part or of rules and regulations, or obstructs or hinders the regulatory authority in the discharge of the regulatory authority's duties, or otherwise operates a food establishment in violation of this part or of rules and regulations commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day of operation after notice of non-compliance of violation has been given and such violation has not been corrected constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 8, part 2, §§ 53-8-201 — 53-8-222 (Acts 1986, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3-23; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 148, § 1; 1995, ch. 383, § 1; 2001, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 2003, ch. 29, § 2), concerning the Retail Food Store Inspection Act of 1986, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 182, §§ 1-21, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 50. July 1, 2015; provided, that, for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2013.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.